Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Proceedings Upon Appeal

Law reviews. —

For article, “Aldo Leopold and Western Water Law: Thinking Perpendicular to the Prior Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1989).

§ 41-4-401.
Rights of appeal to district court.

Any party or number of parties acting jointly, who may feel themselves aggrieved by the determination of the board of control, may have an appeal from the board of control to the district court of the county in which the stream or streams, involved in such determination, may be situated, provided that in case the said stream or streams shall be situate in, and run through more than one (1) judicial district, or more than one (1) county, then, and in such case, it shall be the duty of the board of control, in making its determination, to designate the district court of the county, to which such appeal may be taken. All persons joining in the appeal shall be joined as appellants and all persons having interests adverse to the parties appealing, or either of them, shall be joined as appellees.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 27; R.S. 1899, § 874; Laws 1903, ch. 97, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 779; C.S. 1920, § 900; R.S. 1931, § 122-119; C.S. 1945, § 71-225; W.S. 1957, § 41-193.

Cross references. —

As to conclusiveness of final orders or decrees of state board of control, see §

41-4-326

.

As to limitation of time with reference to rehearings before state board of control after final order of board, see §

41-4-327

.

As to authority of board of control to modify order and correct testimony in connection with the adjudication of water rights, see §

41-4-328

.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The power of the board to adjudicate rights and priorities is concurrent with that of the courts.

Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

Decisions rendered by the board are subject to review by the courts.

Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

The method of appeal from board to district court is wholly statutory.

Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

One not party in original action is not a necessary appellate party. —

Any person who is not a party in an original action is not a necessary party to an appeal, and any interpretation of the last sentence of this section may not be to the contrary. Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

Cited

in

Bergman v. Kearney, 241 F. 884, 1917 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1348 (D. Nev. 1917); Daley v. Anderson, 7 Wyo. 1, 48 P. 839,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1897); In re Water Rights in Big Laramie River, 27 Wyo. 88, 192 P. 680,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(1920).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Procedure Aspects of the PLLRC Report,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 265 (1970).

§§ 41-4-402 through 41-4-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 191, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, §§ 28 through 30, related to appeal procedures. For present similar provisions, see §

41-4-406

.

§ 41-4-406.
Pleadings and practice.

All proceedings on appeal shall be conducted according to the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 30; 1895, ch. 62, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 878; C.S. 1910, § 783; C.S. 1920, § 904; R.S. 1931, § 122-123; C.S. 1945, § 71-229; W.S. 1957, § 41-198; W.S. 1977, §

41-4-406

; Laws 1985, ch. 191, § 1.

Cross references. —

For the Code of Civil Procedure, see title 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Quoted

in

Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 41-4-407.
Procedure after judgment.

It shall be the duty of the clerk of the district court immediately upon the entry of any judgment, order or decree by the district court, or by the judge thereof, in an appeal from the decision of the board of control, to transmit a certified copy of said judgment, order or decree to the secretary of the state board of control. It shall be the duty of the secretary to immediately enter the same upon the records of such office, and the state engineer shall forthwith issue to the superintendent or superintendents of water divisions, instructions in compliance with the said judgment, order or decree, and in execution thereof.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 30; 1895, ch. 62, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 879; C.S. 1910, § 784; C.S. 1920, § 905; R.S. 1931, § 122-124; C.S. 1945, § 71-230; W.S. 1957, § 41-199.

§ 41-4-408.
Costs; division of water pending appeal.

All costs made and accruing by reason of such appeal shall be adjudged to be paid by the party or parties against whom such appeal shall be finally determined. During the time an appeal from the order of the board of control is pending in the district court, and until a certified copy of the judgment, order or decree of the district court is transmitted to the state engineer, the division of water from the stream involved in such appeal shall be made in accordance with the order of the board of control.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 30; 1895, ch. 62, § 8; R.S. 1899, § 880; C.S. 1910, § 785; C.S. 1920, § 906; R.S. 1931, § 122-125; C.S. 1945, § 71-231; W.S. 1957, § 41-200.